Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 10

Communications Systems

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

12-10-201. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Assigned county frequency” means a frequency assigned to a specific county sheriff's office for carrying on day-to-day operations within the county. This frequency is allocated for use by the specific county-based stations and mobile units which are participating in the statewide communications system;

“High band communication system” means frequencies assigned to larger municipal police departments and the county sheriffs' offices of Pulaski County, Garland County, and Sebastian County. The high band communication system frequencies shall be between one hundred fifty megahertz (150 MHz) and one hundred seventy-five megahertz (175 MHz);

“Law enforcement agency” means the county sheriff's department, municipal police department, or city marshal;

“Statewide base-to-base frequency” means a common statewide frequency for carrying on routine business between agencies located in different counties. This frequency is allocated for base station use only. Mobile units are not allowed to operate on this frequency. The statewide base-to-base frequency shall be thirty-seven and two tenths megahertz (37.20 MHz); and

“Statewide emergency frequency” means a common statewide frequency for use in an emergency situation between law enforcement agencies. This frequency is allocated for use by all participating agency-based stations and mobile units. The statewide emergency frequency shall be thirty-seven and twenty-four hundredths megahertz (37.24 MHz).

History.

Acts 1979, No. 520, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1101.

12-10-202. Transmissions by unauthorized persons — Penalty.

It shall be unlawful to transmit over a frequency assigned to a law enforcement agency or department unless it has been approved by the agency or department head or his or her designee.

Violation of this or any other portion of this subchapter shall constitute a Class A misdemeanor.

Cross References. Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a) and (b).

History.

Acts 1979, No. 520, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1108; Acts 1987, No. 251, § 1.

12-10-203. Policy committee.

A seven-member policy committee composed of two (2) representatives each from the Arkansas Sheriffs' Association, the Arkansas Association of Chiefs of Police, and the Arkansas Law Enforcement Officers Association and one (1) representative from the Division of Arkansas State Police will be responsible for policy making and for policing a statewide communication system.

Members of the policy committee will be appointed by the presidents of the respective law enforcement associations and the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 520, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1106; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5833.

12-10-204. Special conditions for use of statewide emergency frequency.

The following constitute conditions whereby the emergency frequency can be used if assistance from other counties or the Department of Arkansas State Police is needed:

A potential life or death situation such as:

A serious traffic accident involving personal injury;

Major danger to life from chemicals, explosives, gas, or nuclear or other hazardous material; or

Implementing rescue efforts;

A felony in progress or pursuing a felon or suspected felon;

A civil disorder;

A natural disaster;

Emergency access to the nearest national crime information center or criminal justice information system computer terminal involving information as needed for subdivision (2) of this section; or

A mobile unit traveling outside its assigned county for conducting official business with law enforcement agencies in that jurisdiction.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 520, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1104.

12-10-205. Frequency allocation.

The assigned county operating frequency will be used for:

Base-to-mobile and mobile-to-mobile unit transmissions within each county;

Base-to-base radio transmissions within those counties which have more than one (1) base station operating on the county frequency;

Emergency transmission using a 10-33 code within each county when assistance from other counties or the Department of Arkansas State Police is not needed; and

With permission of the county sheriffs concerned, adjacent counties may allow each other's mobile units to install, receive, and transmit crystals and operate, when necessary, on each other's assigned county operating frequency.

In lieu of the preceding, adjacent county law enforcement mobile units may install receivers or scanners on each other's assigned county frequency in order to have cross band communication capability with each other.

The statewide base-to-base frequency, thirty-seven and two tenths megahertz (37.20 MHz), will be used for:

All routine base-to-base law enforcement radio transmissions between city and county and law enforcement agencies located in different counties. It can also be used for a base-to-base radio transmission in the same county when necessary; and

Routine access to the nearest state police district headquarters and the nearest national crime information center or criminal justice information system computer terminal.

The statewide emergency frequency, thirty-seven and twenty-four hundredths megahertz (37.24 MHz), will be used under special conditions found in § 12-10-204 and when radio contact between various law enforcement base stations or mobile units is mandatory for the preservation of peace or the protection of life and property.

The statewide emergency frequency may be used by law enforcement agencies within their assigned jurisdiction in the event of a breakdown on the county operating frequency or the statewide base-to-base frequency, only as an interim measure in lieu of the assigned county operating frequency or the statewide base-to-base frequency, if all three (3) of the following conditions are met:

The breakdown has occurred on a base station. Mobile unit breakdowns on the county frequency will not be cause for use of the emergency frequency;

Maximum efforts are exerted in getting the broken-down base station back on the air; and

All surrounding counties are to be advised as to why the emergency frequency is being used in lieu of the county operating frequency or statewide base-to-base frequency and an approximate time as to when this condition will be corrected.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 520, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1102.

12-10-206. Assigned county operating frequency.

The following counties shall be assigned the following frequencies:

Thirty-seven and four hundredths megahertz (37.04 MHz): Calhoun, Chicot, Clark, Faulkner, Fulton, Little River, Monroe, Newton, Poinsett, and Scott;

Thirty-seven and six hundredths megahertz (37.06 MHz): Ashley, Benton, Cleburne, Columbia, Cross, Jefferson, Howard, Logan, Marion, and Randolph;

Thirty-seven and eight hundredths megahertz (37.08 MHz): Baxter, Clay, Drew, Lonoke, Ouachita, Sevier, and Yell;

Thirty-seven and twelve hundredths megahertz (37.12 MHz): Craighead, Dallas, Desha, Madison, Polk, Prairie, and Stone;

Thirty-seven and fourteen hundredths megahertz (37.14 MHz): Carroll, Hot Spring, Lawrence, Lee, Lincoln, and Van Buren;

Thirty-seven and sixteen hundredths megahertz (37.16 MHz): Arkansas, Boone, Crittenden, Nevada, Perry, and Sharp;

Thirty-seven and twenty-eight hundredths megahertz (37.28 MHz): Grant, Greene, Johnson, Lafayette, Montgomery, Phillips, and White;

Thirty-seven and thirty-two hundredths megahertz (37.32 MHz): Cleveland, Conway, Franklin, Independence, Pike, and St. Francis;

Thirty-seven and thirty-six hundredths megahertz (37.36 MHz): Bradley, Crawford, Izard, Mississippi, Pope, Saline, and Woodruff;

Thirty-seven and four tenths megahertz (37.40 MHz): Jackson, Hempstead, Searcy, and Union; and

Thirty-seven and forty-two hundredths megahertz (37.42 MHz): Sebastian.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 520, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1103.

12-10-207. Interfacing the Department of Arkansas State Police Communications System.

In order to interface the separate Department of Arkansas State Police communications system with that of the statewide law enforcement communications system:

All municipal and county law enforcement agencies should install receivers on the frequency of the district of the Department of Arkansas State Police in which their county or city is located, at their base stations and in their vehicles so that effective cross banding of communications with the department can be accomplished when necessary;

All department district headquarters will monitor the statewide base-to-base frequency, thirty-seven and two tenths megahertz (37.20 MHz), and the statewide emergency frequency, thirty-seven and twenty-four hundredths megahertz (37.24 MHz), and respond to calls by transmitting on the frequency of the district of the department in which their county or city is located, which will be monitored by local law enforcement agencies;

All department mobile units will have the capability to monitor the emergency frequency, thirty-seven and twenty-four hundredths megahertz (37.24 MHz), and respond to calls by transmitting on the frequency of the district of the department in which their county or city is located, which will be monitored by local law enforcement agencies; and

With the permission of the department, counties may, at their own expense, place complete mobile radios with the assigned county frequency in department vehicles.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 520, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1105.

12-10-208. Official transmissions only.

All radio transmissions should be used for conducting official law enforcement business only and should be as clear and concise as possible.

Standard “ten signals” and the phonetic alphabet are recommended for use by all participating agencies.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2012, No. 213, § 11, provided: “ENHANCED 9-1-1 SYSTEM.

Funds appropriated in Section 9 of this Act are to be allocated to support the deployment of a hosted supplemental 9-1-1 database service in Arkansas. This supplemental database should allow for Arkansans to provide information to 9-1-1 to be used in emergency scenarios. This database service should:

“a) Collect a variety of formatted data relevant to 9-1-1 and first responder needs. Among other items, this information should include photographs of the citizen, physical descriptions, medical information, household data, and emergency contacts.

“b) Allow for information to be entered by Arkansans via a secure website where they can elect to provide as little or as much information as they choose.

“c) Automatically display data provided by Arkansas to 9-1-1 call takers for all types of phones (Landline, Mobile, VoIP) when a call is placed to 9-1-1 from a registered and confirmed phone number.

“d) Support the delivery of citizen information via a secure internet connection to all PSAPs within Arkansas.

“e) Service should work across all 9-1-1 call taking equipment in Arkansas and allow for the easy transfer of information into Computer Aided Dispatch (CAD) or Records Management Systems (RMS).

“f) Data should be made available at a city, county, state, or national level to help protect Arkansans wherever they are.

“g) Data should be made available to first responders.

“h) Be designed to work in today's environment or future i3-based systems.

“i) Demonstrate the ability to assist Arkansans with functional needs such as the deaf and hard of hearing, families with autism, physical and mental disabilities, and special rescue needs.”

Acts 2019, No. 660, § 1, provided: “Title. This act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Public Safety Act of 2019’”.

Acts 2019, No. 660, § 2, provided: “Legislative findings and intent.

“(a)The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)The State of Arkansas recognizes that maintaining the public's safety is a sacred trust of the government;

“(2)The citizens of Arkansas depend on state government to provide for public welfare and safety; and

“(3)To ensure public welfare and safety, it is important and worthy to achieve the following public safety priorities:

“(A)Developing a next generation 911 system;

“(B)Replacing the Arkansas Emergency Telephone Services Board with the Arkansas 911 Board; and

“(C)Providing upgrades and maintenance funding for the Arkansas Wireless Information Network.

“(b)It is the intent of the General Assembly to simplify and update charges paid by telecommunication subscribers to provide the best public safety communications and services possible to all Arkansas and first responders by:

“(1)Developing a next generation 911 system;

“(2)Replacing the Arkansas Emergency Telephone Services Board with the Arkansas 911 Board; and

“(3)Providing upgrades and maintenance funding for the Arkansas Wireless Information Network”.

Cross References. Public utilities and carriers, §23-1-101 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1985, No. 683, § 12: Mar. 27, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there is an immediate need for designation of the 9-1-1 Emergency Telephone Number and creation of 9-1-1 Public Safety Communications Centers in order to enable response of emergency services which protect life and property to be accessed in a prompt and simplified manner and that enactment of this bill will hasten the availability of these services. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect from and after the date of its approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 1196, § 9: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1991 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1991 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1995, No. 627, § 5: Mar. 14, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that political subdivisions with less than fifteen thousand (15,000) population are not able to provide a 911 service under the current restrictions on emergency telephone service charges; that this act grants greater flexibility to those political subdivisions; and that this act should go into effect as soon as possible in order to help provide 911 service to the portions of this state which do not now have the capability of financing the same. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 106, § 5: Feb. 6, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that political subdivisions with less than twenty-five thousand (25,000) population are not able to provide a 911 service under the current restrictions on emergency telephone service charges; that this act grants greater flexibility to those political subdivisions; and that this act should go into effect as soon as possible in order to help provide 911 service to the portions of this state which do not now have the capability of financing the same. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 952, § 6: Mar. 31, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that political subdivisions with less than twenty-seven thousand five hundred population are not able to provide a 911 service under the current restrictions on emergency telephone service charges; that this act grants greater flexibility to those political subdivisions; and that this act should go into effect as soon as possible in order to help provide 911 service to the portions of this state which do not now have the capability of financing the same. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 46, § 5: Feb. 11, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that there is an immediate need for the proportionate and speedy disbursement of funds to public safety answering point (PSAP) administrators; that such proportionate disbursement of funds will better enable PSAP administrators to ensure that CMRS calls are properly answered and disposed of; that this act will better enable a prompt response to 911 service calls resulting in the protection of life and property; that until this act goes into effect the citizens of this State will be denied the protection better afforded by it. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 907, § 3: amendment effective by its own terms on Aug. 1, 2002.

Acts 2003, No. 1792, § 2: Apr. 22, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that existing CMRS emergency telephone service charges collected are insufficient to allow some political subdivisions serving as default public safety answering points or experiencing high volumes of commuter traffic to recover their costs incurred in properly answering 911 emergency calls and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure adequate 911 emergency service continues to be provided. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 582, § 3: Mar. 28, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that declining landline 911 surcharges have caused an immediate loss of revenues for public safety answering points and additional revenues are vital to the continuing operations of those public safety answering points. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 117: July 31, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes various revisions to Arkansas election laws that are designed to improve the administration of elections and special elections and that these revisions should be implemented as soon as possible so that the citizens of this state may benefit from improved election procedures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 623, § 8: Jan. 1, 2014. Effective date clause provided: “This act is effective on and after January 1, 2014.”

Acts 2017, No. 574, § 2: July 1, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by theGeneral Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there are currently more than one hundred twenty (120) public safety answering points in the state; that many of these public safety answering points are in close proximity toothers, creating a duplication of services and errors in 911 service; and that this act is necessary to save taxpayer money and create more efficient government services. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2017.”

Acts 2019, No. 660, § 11: Oct. 1, 2019. Effective date clause provided: “Sections 4 and 8 of this act are effective on and after October 1, 2019”.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 520, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1107.

Subchapter 3

— Arkansas Public Safety Communications and Next Generation 911 Act of 2019

12-10-301. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Public Safety Communications and Next Generation 911 Act of 2019”.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 683, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 73-1822; Acts 2019, No. 660, § 3.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment inserted “shall be known and” and “and Next Generation 911” and substituted “2019” for “1985”.

12-10-302. Legislative findings, policy, and purpose.

It has been determined to be in the public interest to shorten the time and simplify the method required for a citizen to request and receive emergency aid.

The provision of a single, primary three-digit emergency number through which fire suppression, rescue, disaster and major emergency, emergency medical, and law enforcement services may be quickly and efficiently obtained will provide a significant contribution to response by simplifying notification of these emergency service responders. A simplified means of procuring these emergency services will result in saving of life, a reduction in the destruction of property, quicker apprehension of criminals, and ultimately the saving of moneys.

Establishment of a uniform emergency telephone number is a matter of concern to all citizens.

The emergency number 911 has been made available at the national level for implementation throughout the United States and Canada.

It is found and declared necessary to:

Establish the National Emergency Number 911 (nine, one, one) as the primary emergency telephone number for use in participating political subdivisions of the State of Arkansas;

Authorize each chief executive to direct establishment and operation of public safety answering points in their political subdivisions and to designate the location of a public safety answering point and agency which is to operate the center. As both are elected positions, a county judge must obtain concurrence of the county sheriff;

Encourage the political subdivisions to implement public safety answering points; and

Provide a method of funding for the political subdivisions, subject to the jurisdiction of the Arkansas 911 Board, which will allow them to implement, operate, and maintain a public safety answering point.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “public safety answering points” for “911 public safety communications center” in (e)(2) and (e)(3); substituted “public safety answering point” for “911 public safety communications center” in (e)(2); and, in (e)(4), inserted “subject to the jurisdiction of the Arkansas 911 Board” and substituted “answering point” for “communications center”.

Cited: West Wash. County Emergency Medical Servs. v. Washington County, 967 F.2d 1252 (8th Cir. 1992).

History.

Acts 1985, No. 683, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 73-1823; Acts 2019, No. 660, § 3.

12-10-303. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Access line” means a communications line or device that has the capacity to access the public switched network;

“Automatic location identification” means an enhanced 911 service capability that enables the automatic display of information defining the geographical location of the telephone used to place the 911 call;

“Automatic number identification” means an enhanced 911 service capability that enables the automatic display of the ten-digit number used to place a 911 call from a wire line, wireless, voice over internet protocol, or any nontraditional phone service;

“Basic 911 system” means a system by which the various emergency functions provided by public safety agencies within each political subdivision may be accessed utilizing the three-digit number 911, but no available options are included in the system;

“Chief executive” means the Governor, county judges, mayors, city managers, or city administrators of incorporated places, and is synonymous with head of government, dependent on the level and form of government;

“CMRS connection” means each account or number assigned to a CMRS customer;

“Commercial mobile radio service” or “CMRS” means commercial mobile service under §§ 3(33) and 332(d), Telecommunications Act of 1996, 47 U.S.C. § 151 et seq., Federal Communications Commission rules, and the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1993.

“Commercial mobile radio service” or “CMRS” includes any wireless or two-way communication device that has the capability of connecting to a public safety answering point;

“Dispatch center” means a public or private agency that dispatches public or private safety agencies but does not operate a public safety answering point;

“Enhanced 911 network features” means those features of selective routing that have the capability of automatic number and location identification;

“Enhanced 911 system” means enhanced 911 service, which is a telephone exchange communications service consisting of telephone network features and public safety answering points designated by the chief executive that enables users of the public telephone system to access a public safety answering point by dialing the digits “911”.

The enhanced 911 system directs 911 calls to appropriate public safety answering points by selective routing based on the geographical location from which the call originated and provides the capability for automatic number identification and automatic location identification;

“ESINet” means a managed internet protocol network that is used for emergency services communications that can be shared by all public safety agencies and that provides the internet protocol transport infrastructure upon which independent application platforms and core services can be deployed, including without limitation those services necessary for providing next generation 911 services.

“ESINet” is the designation for the network, but not the services on the network;

“Exchange access facilities” means all lines provided by the service supplier for the provision of local exchange service;

“Geographic information system” means a system for capturing, storing, displaying, analyzing, and managing data and associated attributes which are spatially referenced;

“Governing authority” means county quorum courts and governing bodies of municipalities;

“Next generation 911” means a secure, internet protocol-based, open standards system, composed of hardware, software, data, and operation policies and procedures, that:

Provides standardized interfaces from emergency call and message services to support emergency communications;

Processes all types of emergency calls, including voice, text, data, and multimedia information;

Acquires and integrates additional emergency call data useful to call routing and handling;

Delivers the emergency calls, messages, and data to the appropriate public safety answering point and other appropriate emergency entities based on the location of the caller;

Supports data, video, and other communications needs for coordinated incident response and management; and

Interoperates with services and networks used by first responders to facilitate emergency response;

“Nontraditional phone service” means any service that:

Enables real-time voice communications from the user's location to customer premise equipment;

Permits users to receive calls that originate on the public switched telephone network or to terminate calls to the public switched telephone network; and

Has the capability of placing a 911 call;

“Nontraditional phone service connection” means each account or number assigned to a nontraditional phone service customer;

“Operating agency” means the public safety agency authorized and designated by the chief executive of the political subdivision to operate a public safety answering point.

Operating agencies are limited to offices of emergency services, fire departments, and law enforcement agencies of the political subdivisions;

“Prepaid wireless telecommunications service” means a prepaid wireless calling service as defined in § 26-52-314;

“Private safety agency” means any entity, except a public safety agency, providing emergency fire, ambulance, or emergency medical services;

“Public safety agency” means an agency of the State of Arkansas or a functional division of a political subdivision that provides firefighting, rescue, natural, or human-caused disaster or major emergency response, law enforcement, and ambulance or emergency medical services;

“Public safety answering point” means the location at which all 911 communications are initially answered that is operated on a twenty-four-hour basis by an operating agency and dispatches two (2) or more public safety agencies;

“Public safety officers” means specified personnel of public safety agencies;

“Readiness costs” means equipment and payroll costs associated with equipment, call takers, and dispatchers on standby waiting for 911 calls;

“Selective routing” means the method employed to direct 911 calls to the appropriate public safety answering point based on the geographical location from which the call originated;

“Service supplier” means any person, company, or corporation, public or private, providing exchange telephone service, nontraditional phone service, voice over internet protocol service, or CMRS service throughout the political subdivision;

“Service user” means any person, company, corporation, business, association, or party not exempt from county or municipal taxes or utility franchise assessments that is provided landline telephone service, CMRS service, voice over internet protocol service, or any nontraditional phone service with the capability of placing a 911 call in the political subdivision;

“Short message service” means a service typically provided by mobile carriers that sends short messages to an endpoint;

“Tariff rate” means the rate or rates billed by a service supplier as stated in the service supplier's tariffs, price lists, customer contracts, or other methods of publishing service offerings that represent the service supplier's recurring charges for exchange access facilities, exclusive of all:

Taxes;

Fees;

Licenses; or

Similar charges whatsoever.

The tariff rate per county may include extended service area charges only if an emergency telephone service charge has been levied in a county and a resolution of intent has been passed by a county's quorum court that defines tariff rate as being inclusive of extended service area charges;

“Telecommunicator” means a person employed by a public safety answering point or an emergency medical dispatcher service provider, or both, who is qualified to answer incoming emergency telephone calls or provide for the appropriate emergency response, or both, either directly or through communication with the appropriate public safety answering point;

“Voice over internet protocol connection” means each account or number assigned to a voice over internet protocol customer;

“Voice over internet protocol service” means any service that:

Enables real-time voice communications;

Requires a broadband connection from the user's location;

Requires internet protocol compatible customer premise equipment;

Permits users to receive calls that originate on the public switched telephone network or to terminate calls to the public switched telephone network; and

Has the capability of placing a 911 call; and

“Wireless telecommunications service provider” means a provider of commercial mobile radio services:

As defined in 47 U.S.C. § 332(b), as it existed on January 1, 2006, including all broadband personal communications services, wireless radio telephone services, geographic-area-specialized and enhanced-specialized mobile radio services, and incumbent, wide area, specialized mobile radio licensees that offer real-time, two-way voice service interconnected with the public switched telephone network; and

That either:

Is doing business in the State of Arkansas; or

May connect with a public safety answering point.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment added the subdivision designations; in (2), substituted “ten-digit” for “seven-digit” and added “from a wire line, wireless, voice over internet protocol, or any non-traditional phone service”; substituted “Arkansas” for “CMRS” in (4); inserted present (14), (15), and (17) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; in (24), substituted “landline telephone service, CMRS service, voice over internet protocol service, or any non-traditional phone service with the capability of placing a 911 call” for “telephone service or” and made a related change; and added (26), (27) and (28).

The 2009 amendment added present (22).

The 2013 amendment rewrote (17); and substituted “price lists, customer service contracts, or other methods of publishing service offerings that represent” for “and approved by the Arkansas Public Service Commission, which represents” in (26)(A) [now (27)(A)].

The 2015 amendment inserted the definition of “Secondary public safety answering point”.

The 2019 amendment rewrote the section.

U.S. Code. The federal definition of commercial mobile service referred to in subdivision (7)(A) of this section is codified as 47 U.S.C. § 332(d), and the definition of mobile service is codified as 47 U.S.C. § 153(33).

History.

Acts 1985, No. 683, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 73-1824; Acts 1997, No. 810, § 1; 2003, No. 668, § 1; 2007, No. 582, § 1; 2009, No. 1221, § 1; 2013, No. 623, §§ 1, 2; 2015, No. 919, § 1; 2019, No. 660, § 3.